California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
DIVISION 4.5. NOTICE OF SPECIAL ASSESSMENT, SPECIAL TAX, AND FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS [3100. - 3124.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [3100. - 3101.]

3100.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this part govern the construction of this division:

(a) “Assessment” or “special assessment” means the original assessment and any reassessment or supplemental assessment upon lands within the assessment district.

(b) “Assessment district” means the territory containing the lands to be specially assessed.

(c) “Lienholder” means any person or city who as a result of proceedings taken under the principal act and any bond act used in conjunction therewith, owns or is entitled to enforce a lien against a specifically described lot, parcel, or piece of land within the district.

(d) “Bond act” means any statute, charter, or procedural ordinance under which bonds are issued (1) to represent unpaid special assessments imposed in proceedings taken pursuant to the principal act or (2) which are secured by authority to levy special taxes conferred in proceedings taken pursuant to the principal act.

(e) “City” means any city, county, city and county, district, public corporation, or public entity authorized to use the principal act.

(f) “Community facilities district” means the territory within a district formed purusant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(g) “District” means an assessment district or community facilities district.

(h) “Legislative body” means the legislative body or governing board of a city.

(i) “Map of the district” means a plat or map indicating by a boundary line the extent of the territory included in the district.

(j) “Principal act” means the statute, charter, or procedural ordinance under which the proceedings are being conducted.

(k) “Proceedings” means proceedings taken pursuant to the principal act for the construction of any public improvement or the acquisition of any property for public use, or both, or for the furnishing of services pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, where (1) any part of the cost thereof is to be paid by special assessments levied upon lots, parcels, or pieces of land within a district in proportion to the benefits to be received by each lot, parcel, or piece of land from that improvement or acquisition, or (2) any part of the cost thereof is to be paid by special taxes levied or authorized to be levied upon lots, parcels, or pieces of land within a community facilities district.

(l) “Sale or foreclosure” means any action or proceeding by any city officer or in any court for the enforcement of payment of special taxes, principal, or interest due upon any special assessment or bond constituting a lien against real property by the sale or foreclosure of all or any part of the real property or the lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 42.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3101.

All curative provisions of the principal act and any bond act used in conjunction therewith, including rules of construction, limitations of actions, and provisions relating to reassessments, waiver and estoppel, the conclusive effect of any act or instrument, and the effect of errors, informalities and defects, shall apply to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1210.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FILING OF MAPS OF DISTRICTS AND RECORDATION OF NOTICES [3110. - 3117.5.]

3110.

(a) The proposed boundaries of the district to be specially taxed or assessed in proceedings shall be described by resolution or ordinance adopted by the legislative body prior to the hearing on the formation or extent of the district. The description of the proposed boundaries shall be by reference to a map of the district that shall indicate by a boundary line the extent of the territory included in the proposed district and the map shall govern for all details as to the extent of the district. The map shall also contain the name of the
 city and a distinctive designation, in words or by number, of the district shown on the map.

(b) The map shall be legibly drawn, printed or reproduced by a process that provides a permanent record. Each sheet of paper or other material used for the map shall be 18 by 26 inches in size, shall have clearly shown therein the particular number of the sheet, the total number of sheets comprising the map, and its relation to each adjoining sheet, and shall have encompassing its border a line that leaves a blank margin one inch in width.

The map shall be labeled substantially as follows: Proposed Boundaries of (here insert name or number of district) (here insert name of city and county thereafter), State of California.

In addition, if the resolution of intention to create the district proposes that some or all tax or bond proceeds of the district would be used to
 pay for cleanup of any hazardous substance, the map label shall include the following statement in large, conspicuous letters:

TAXES LEVIED BY THIS DISTRICT MAY BE USED TO PAY FOR CLEANUP OF HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES.

If the map consists of more than one page, the same entitlement shall be on each page.

The map shall also have thereon legends reading substantially as follows:

(1) Filed in the office of the (clerk of the legislative body) this ____ day of ____, 20__.(Clerk of the legislative body)(2) I hereby certify that the within map showing proposed boundaries of (here insert name or number of district) (here insert name of city, and, if not a county, insert name of county thereafter), State of California, was approved by the city council (or other appropriate legislative body) of the (here insert city) at a regular meeting thereof, held on the ____ day of ____, 20__, by its Resolution No. ____.

(3) Filed this ____ day of ____, 20__, at the hour of ____ o’clock _m. in Book ____ of Maps of Assessment and Community Facilities Districts at page ____, in the office of the county recorder in the County of ____, State of California.(County Recorder of
 County of ______)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3110.5.

In the case of annexation proceedings in connection with a community facilities district, a separate map of the area proposed to be annexed shall be prepared and adopted by the legislative body by resolution or ordinance prior to the hearing on the proposed annexation. It shall be entitled “Annexation Map No. ____ of Community Facilities District No. ____ of ____, ____ County, California” and shall reference by title, book, page, and recording date, the original (or if it has been amended, the most recent) boundary map of the community facilities district. The provisions of this part shall apply to the annexation map in all other respects as if it were an
 original community facilities district boundary map. Annexation shall not be considered modification or amendment of the boundaries of the community facilities district for purposes of this part, although an annexation map may be modified or amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

On the original and on at least one copy of the map of the district, the clerk of the legislative body shall endorse his or her certificate evidencing the date and adoption of the resolution or ordinance describing the proposed boundaries of the district. The clerk of the legislative body shall file the original of the map in his or her office and, within 15 days after the adoption of the resolution or ordinance fixing the time and place of the hearing on the formation or extent of the district and in no event later than 15 days prior to the hearing, shall file a
 copy thereof with the county recorder of each county in which all or any part of the proposed district is located upon payment of the filing fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.

The county recorder shall endorse on the copy of the map of the district the time and date of the filing and shall store maps in any manner as will assure that the maps be kept together, safe, and reproducible. The county recorder shall index the maps by name of the city conducting the proceedings and by the distinctive designation of the district as shown on each map.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 427, Sec. 23.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.5.

The clerk of the board of supervisors of any county in whose office maps of proposed districts are filed shall transmit the maps to the county recorder, who shall receive the maps with the same effect and manner as maps filed with the county recorder pursuant to Section 3112.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3113.

The legislative body shall not order a modification in the boundaries of a district shown on a previously filed map of the district unless the legislative body describes the proposed modification by reference to an amended map of the district boundary. The amended map shall be approved by resolution adopted by the legislative body and the clerk of the legislative body shall file the amended map showing the modification of boundaries of the district with the county recorder not later than 15 days after the resolution of the legislative body approving the amended boundary. The map shall also contain the legends provided for in Section 3110.

The county recorder shall endorse the time and date of the filing upon the modified or amended boundary map that is stored in the
 recorder’s office pursuant to Section 3112. The county recorder shall cross-index the amended boundary map by reference to page and book of maps of assessment and community facilities districts in which the original boundary map of the affected district was filed.

The amended boundary map shall include on its face that it amends the boundary map for (here insert name or number of district or both name and number of district, together with city or county, or both city and county), State of California, prior recorded at Book __ of Maps of Assessment and Community Facilities Districts at page __, in the office of the County Recorder for the County of ____, State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 427, Sec. 24.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3113.5.

All modifications, amendments, and annexations may be consolidated in a single map at any time at the direction of the local legislative body. The map shall supersede all previously recorded maps and shall be processed by the county recorder as provided in Section 3113. References on the face of the map, and the cross-indexing, shall include all maps then being superseded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1110, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

3114.

(a) This section applies only to assessment districts.

(b) After the confirmation by the legislative body of any assessment, the clerk of the legislative body shall file, in the office of the county recorder, a copy of the assessment diagram.

(c) The assessment diagram shall be prepared by the engineer responsible for engineering work. The assessment diagram shall be legibly drawn, and at least one copy shall be printed or reproduced by a process that provides a permanent record. Each sheet of paper or other material used for the permanent record map shall be 18 by 26 inches in size, shall clearly show the particular number of the sheet, the total number of
 sheets comprising the map, its relation to each adjoining sheet, and shall have encompassing its border a line that leaves a blank margin one inch in width.

The map shall be labeled substantially as follows: Assessment Diagram, (here insert name or number of district) Assessment District, (here insert city and name of county thereafter), State of California.

The map shall also have legends reading substantially as follows: 

(1) Filed in the office of the (clerk of the legislative body), this ____ day of ____, 20__.(Clerk of the legislative body)(2) Recorded in the office of the (superintendent of streets) this ____ day of ____, 20__.(Superintendent of Streets)(3) An assessment was levied by the city council (or other appropriate legislative body) on the lots, pieces, and parcels of land shown on this assessment diagram. The assessment was levied on the ____ day of ____, 20__; the assessment diagram and the assessment roll were recorded in the office of the superintendent
 of streets of that city on the ____ day of ____, 20__. Reference is made to the assessment roll recorded in the office of the superintendent of streets for the exact amount of each assessment levied against each parcel of land shown on this assessment diagram.(Clerk of the legislative body)(4) Filed this ____ day of ____, 20__, at the hour of ____ o’clock __m. in Book ____ of Maps of Assessment and Community Facilities Districts at page ____, in the office of the county recorder of the County of ____, State of California.(County Recorder of County of ______)(d) The clerk of the legislative body shall file a copy of the assessment diagram referred to in subdivision (c) in the office of the county recorder of the county in which all or any part of the assessment district shown on the assessment diagram is located upon payment of the filing fee. The filing of the assessment diagram shall be made by the clerk of the legislative body.

(e) The county recorder shall endorse upon the assessment diagram filed with the recorder, pursuant to subdivision
 (d), the time and date of filing and shall store maps in any manner as will assure that the maps be kept together, safe, and reproducible pursuant to Section 3112. The county recorder shall cross-index the assessment diagram by reference to the city conducting the proceedings and by reference to the recording instrument number or the page of the book of maps of assessment and community facilities districts in which the boundary map of the district was filed in the book.

(f) After the confirmation by the legislative body of any assessment and the recording of the assessment and diagram in the office of the street superintendent or other officer of the city in whose office the assessment and diagram have been recorded, the clerk of the legislative body shall execute and record a notice of assessment in the office of the county recorder of each county in which all or any part of the assessment district is located. The notice of assessment shall be
 in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF ASSESSMENT

Pursuant to the requirements of Section 3114 of the Streets and Highways Code, the undersigned clerk of the legislative body of ____, State of California, hereby gives notice that a diagram and assessment were recorded in the office of the ____ of that city as provided for in Section 3114 of the Streets and Highways Code, and relating to the following described real property:

(The real property in the assessment district may be described by: (a) stating its exterior boundaries; or (b) describing the property according to any official or recorded map; or (c) referring to the assessment diagram filed in accordance with subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 3114 and the book and page number in the office of the county recorder of the filed plat or map.)

Notice is further
 given that upon the recording of this notice in the office of the county recorder, the several assessments assessed on the lots, pieces, and parcels shown on the filed assessment diagram shall become a lien upon the lots or portions of lots assessed, respectively.

Reference is made to the assessment diagram and assessment roll recorded in the office of the ____ of that city.

______________
Dated: _______If the assessment district is located in two or more counties, the assessment notice, in lieu of the paragraph following the description of the property, shall state: 

Notice is further given that the above-described real property is located in the Counties of ____ and ____ and upon the recording of this notice in the office of the county recorder of all those counties, effective upon the date of the last recording, the several assessments on the lots, pieces, and parcels shown on the filed assessment diagram shall become a lien upon the lots or portions of lots assessed, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 427, Sec. 25.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3114.3.

If an assessment has been prepaid, in whole or in part, pursuant to the principal act, the treasurer shall record an addendum to the notice of assessment recorded pursuant to Section 3114 which states that the recorded assessment against the identified parcel or parcels has been paid in full or in part, and that the associated lien against those parcels has been discharged in whole or in part.

The addendum and its recording has no effect on the authority of the legislative body with respect to any identified parcel by reason of its inclusion in the assessment district or assessment for the work, acquisitions, or
 improvements, and a statement to that effect shall be included in the addendum recorded pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 966, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

3114.5.

(a) This section applies only to community facilities districts.

(b) Within 15 days, in the case of a landowner vote, or 90 days, in the case of a registered voter election, after determination pursuant to Section 53328 of the Government Code that the requisite number of voters is in favor of the levy of a special tax, the clerk of the legislative body shall execute and record a notice of special tax lien in the office of the county recorder of each county in which all or any
 part of the community facilities district is located, and the county recorder shall accept that notice. The county recorder shall index the notice of special tax liens to the names of the property owners within the community facilities district and shown in the notice, as grantors. The notice of special tax lien shall contain the information required by Section 27288.1 of the Government Code and shall be in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF SPECIAL TAX LIEN

Pursuant to the requirements of Section 3114.5 of the Streets and Highways Code and Section 53328.3 of the Government Code, the undersigned clerk of the legislative body of ____, State of California, hereby gives notice that a lien to secure payment of a special tax is hereby imposed by the (here insert name of legislative body) of (here insert city and name of county thereafter), State of California. The special tax secured by this lien is authorized
 to be levied for the purpose of: (as applicable) (1) paying principal and interest on bonds, the proceeds of which are being used to finance (briefly describe facilities financed); (2) providing (briefly describe facilities financed without bonds); (3) providing (briefly describe services being financed).

If all or any portion of the proceeds of taxes or bonds of the district are authorized to be used to pay for cleanup of hazardous substances pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 53313 of the Government Code, the notice shall also contain the following statement in large conspicuous type:

TAXES LEVIED BY THIS DISTRICT MAY BE USED TO PAY FOR CLEANUP OF HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCES.

The special tax is authorized to be levied within Community Facilities District No. ___ that has now been officially formed and the lien of the special tax is a continuing lien that shall
 secure each annual levy of the special tax and that shall continue in force and effect until the special tax obligation is prepaid, permanently satisfied, and canceled in accordance with law or until the special tax ceases to be levied and a notice of cessation of special tax is recorded in accordance with Section 53330.5 of the Government Code.

The rate, method of apportionment, and manner of collection of the authorized special tax is as follows: (here insert verbatim the description of the rate, method of apportionment, and manner of collection from the resolution of formation of the community facilities district). Conditions under which the obligation to pay the special tax may be prepaid and permanently satisfied and the lien of the special tax canceled are as follows: (here insert the conditions set forth in the resolution of formation or, if no provision has been made for prepayment of the special tax obligation, so state).

Notice is further given that upon the recording of this notice in the office of the county recorder, the obligation to pay the special tax levy shall become a lien upon all nonexempt real property within Community Facilities District No. ____ in accordance with Section 3115.5 of the Streets and Highways Code.

The name(s) of the owner(s) and the assessor’s tax parcel number(s) of the real property included within this community facilities district and not exempt from the special tax are as follows: (insert name(s) of owner(s) and tax parcel number(s) shown on assessment roll).

Reference is made to the boundary map (or the amended boundary map) of the community facilities district recorded at Book ___ of Maps of Assessment and Community Facilities Districts at Page ___, in the office of the County Recorder for the County of ____, State of California which map is now the final boundary
 map of the community facilities district.

For further information concerning the current and estimated future tax liability of owners or purchasers of real property subject to this special tax lien, interested persons should contact (here provide name, address, and telephone number of the appropriate office, department, or bureau of the public entity designated pursuant to Section 53340.2 of the Government Code).

(c) The county recorder shall endorse upon the notice the time and date of filing, and shall cross index the notice by reference to the page of the book of maps of assessment and community facilities districts in which the boundary map of the district was filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3115.

(a) This section applies only to assessment districts. The lien duration provisions of subdivision (c) apply to any assessments, regardless of when levied and which are being levied on the effective date of the act which amended this section during the 1986 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(b) From the date of the recording in the office of the county recorder pursuant to Section 3114, or if the assessment district is located in two or more counties then from the date of the recording in the office of the county recorder where a notice is
 last recorded, all persons are deemed to have notice of the contents of the assessment.

(c) Immediately effective on the date of the last of the recordings, pursuant to subdivision (b), each of the assessments is a lien upon the property against which it is made. Unless sooner discharged, the lien continues for the period of 10 years from the date of the recordation or, if bonds are issued to represent the assessment, until the expiration of four years after the due date of the last installment on the bonds or of the last principal coupon attached thereto, or until four years after the due date of the last installment on any refunding bonds or of the last principal coupon attached thereto, whichever is longer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 51.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3115.5.

(a) This section applies only to community facilities districts.

(b) From the date of the recording in the office of the county recorder pursuant to Section 3114.5, or if the community facilities district is located in two or more counties, then from the date of the recording in the office of each county recorder where a notice is recorded, all persons are deemed to have notice of the contents of the Notice of Special Tax Lien with respect to parcels in that county.

(c) Upon the date of the recordings made pursuant to subdivision (b), the notice of special tax lien shall impose a lien upon all nonexempt real property in the district within that county. The lien imposed pursuant to this section shall continue in force and effect until the special tax obligation is prepaid and permanently satisfied and the lien canceled in accordance with law or until the special tax ceases to be levied and a notice of cessation of special tax is recorded in accordance with Section 53330.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

3116.

The fees of the county recorder for recording and indexing any document provided for in this division shall be in the amounts specified in Section 27361 of the Government Code, and the fees of the county recorder for filing the copy of the map of the proposed district shall be in the amounts specified in Section 27372 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 53.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3117.

If any proceedings are abandoned by the legislative body, the clerk of the legislative body shall, upon that abandonment, record a certified copy of the resolution of abandonment with the county recorder of each county in which all or any part of the district is located. The certificate of the clerk of the legislative body attached to the resolution shall include a reference to the date of the resolution of abandonment, the date of the original resolution of intention, and the date the map of the district was filed with the county recorder. The county recorder shall index the resolution in the book containing the index of the maps
 of assessment and community facilities districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 54.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3117.5.

(a) In the event of amendment or modification of, or annexation to, the boundaries of a community facilities district, an amendment to the Notice of Special Tax Lien shall be prepared and recorded under the procedure of Section 3114.5. In the listing of property owners, the amended notice need only list separately the names of the owners and assessor’s tax parcel numbers of parcels being added to the district and the names of the owners and assessor’s parcel numbers of parcels being excluded from the district. This amendment need not
 supersede the existing notice.

(b) If any proceedings subsequent to the approval by the voters of a special tax pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, result in a change in the authorization to levy a special tax or to issue bonds, or a change in the facilities or services authorized to be financed, the clerk of the legislative body shall record an amendment to the original (or, if it has been superseded, the most recent) Notice of Special Tax Lien and any amendments thereto that shall reference the recorder’s serial or document number and recording date of that notice and any amendments to it and shall clearly set forth the changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 670, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. RECORDATION OF NOTICE OF PENDENCY OF SALE OR FORECLOSURE [3120. - 3124.]

3120.

Where there is a delinquency in the payment of special taxes levied pursuant to the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code or principal and interest due upon a special assessment or bond and a sale or foreclosure is commenced, notice of the pendency of the sale or foreclosure shall be filed as provided in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 56.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3121.

Not later than 10 days after (1) making demand upon or application to the treasurer or other officer of the city to sell property for the delinquency or (2) commencing an action or proceeding in any court to foreclose the lien of the special assessment or bond, the lienholder shall record with the county recorder a notice of pendency of the sale or foreclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 57.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3122.

The notice of pendency shall contain the name of the lienholder, describe the lien, state that a sale or foreclosure, as the case may be, has been commenced, refer to and identify the sale or foreclosure, and describe the property affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 58.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3123.

Such notice of pendency shall be in addition to any notice required to be given by the principal act or bond act pursuant to which such sale or foreclosure is being taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1210.)
-------------------------------------------

3123.1.

The lienholder is entitled to recover the cost of recordation of any notice of pendency in any sale or foreclosure resulting from the delinquency and provision therefor shall be made in any notice, order, or judgment authorizing or providing for the sale or foreclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 59.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

3124.

This part does not apply in any case where payments of special taxes or principal and interest due upon a special assessment or bond are enforced for delinquency in the same manner and at the same times as general taxes of the city on real property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1102, Sec. 60.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. THE IMPROVEMENT ACT OF 1911 [5000. - 6794.]



PART 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS [5000. - 5026.]

5000.

This division may be cited as the Improvement Act of 1911.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this part shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

This division provides an alternative system for doing the work authorized by this division and the provisions of this division shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this code.

When any proceedings are commenced under this division, the provisions of this division and no other shall apply to such proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

This division shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes. No error, irregularity, informality, and no neglect or omission of any officer, in any procedure taken under this division, which does not directly affect the jurisdiction of the legislative body to order the work or improvement, shall avoid or invalidate such proceeding or any assessment for the cost of work done thereunder. The exclusive remedy of any person affected or aggrieved thereby shall be by appeal to the legislative body in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

Whenever in any proceedings under this division, a time and place for any hearing by the legislative body is fixed and, from any cause, the hearing is not then and there held or regularly adjourned to a time and place fixed, the power of the legislative body in the premises shall not thereby be divested or lost, but the legislative body may proceed anew to fix a time and place for the hearing, and cause notice thereof to be given by publication by at least one insertion in a daily, semiweekly or weekly newspaper, such publication to be at least five days before the date of the hearing, and thereupon the legislative body shall have power to act as in the first instance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

“City” includes counties, cities, cities and counties and all corporations organized and existing for municipal purposes, together with resort districts organized and existing under the Resort Improvement District Law (Division 11 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Public Resources Code), and any special district organized for the purpose of aiding in the development or improvement of navigation or commerce to, or within, the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

“Legislative body” when used with reference to a county means the board of supervisors, and when used with reference to a city means the body which by law constitutes the legislative department of the government of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

“Clerk” when used with reference to a county means the person or officer who is the clerk of the legislative body of the county, and when used with reference to a city means the person or officer who is or acts as clerk of the legislative body of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

“Treasurer” when used with reference to a county means the county treasurer, and when used with reference to a city means the city treasurer. “Treasurer” also includes any person or officer who has charge and makes payment of the funds of such county or city, respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

“Mayor” when used with reference to a county means the chairman of the board of supervisors, and when used with reference to a city means the mayor, or if the city has no mayor, the chairman or the president of the legislative body, the city manager or such other person as may be the chief executive officer of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.

“Council chambers” refers to the place where the regular meetings of the legislative body of the county or city are held.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

“Street superintendent” or “superintendent of streets” when used with reference to a county means the county surveyor, and when used with reference to a city means the person or officer whose duty it is under the law to have the care or charge of the streets or the improvement thereof in such city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

If there is no street superintendent or superintendent of streets in any city, the legislative body thereof may appoint a person to perform the duties imposed upon the street superintendent by this division, and all of the provisions of this division applicable to the street superintendent shall apply to the person so appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.5.

In a city in which there is a superintendent of streets or street superintendent, the legislative body of the city may nevertheless appoint another person to perform the duties imposed upon the street superintendent by this division and all of the provisions of this division applicable to the street superintendent shall apply to the person so appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1850.)
-------------------------------------------

5013.

“Engineer” when applied to a county means the county surveyor, and when applied to a city means the city engineer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5014.

“Street” includes avenues, highways, lanes, alleys, crossings, or intersections and courts which have been dedicated and accepted according to law or which have been in common and undisputed use by the public for a period of not less than five years next preceding, or which have been dedicated to a semipublic use by way of a dedication made for the exclusive use and benefit of all properties located within the boundaries of a community services district formed under the provisions of the Community Services District Law (commencing with Section 61000 of the Government Code), or which are privately owned, opened to public traffic, and located within the boundaries of an assessment district established to provide street lighting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

5018.

“Place” includes any public park or pleasure ground and common which has been dedicated and accepted according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.

“Paved” or “repaved” includes pavement of stone, paving blocks or macadamizing, or of bituminous rock or asphalt, or of iron, wood or other material, whether patented or not, which is adopted by ordinance or resolution by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5020.

“Contractor” means the person, firm, partnership, association, corporation, organization or business trust, and includes contracting owners or their agents, to whom a contract for the performance of any work authorized by this division is awarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5021.

“Owner” means the person owning the fee, or the person in whose name the legal title to the property appears, by deed duly recorded in the county recorder’s office of the county in which the property is situated, or the person in possession of the property or buildings under claim of, or exercising acts of ownership over the same for himself, or as the executor, administrator, guardian, or conservator of the owner. If the property is leased, the possession of the tenant or lessee holding and occupying such property shall be deemed to be the possession of the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.

“Lot,” “land,” “piece,” or “parcel of land” whether used singly or in combination include property owned or controlled by any person as a railroad right of way or as a street or interurban railroad right of way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5022.5.
